District of Columbia statutes.
8-108.03

Restrictions on the use of perchloroethylene and n-propyl bromide in dry cleaning.

(a)

After January 1, 2014, no person or legal entity shall install a machine designed to use perchloroethylene or n-propyl bromide as a cleaning agent for clothes or other fabrics.

(b)

After January 1, 2029, no person or legal entity shall use perchloroethylene or n-propyl bromide as a cleaning agent for clothes or other fabrics.

(c)

For the purposes of this section, the term a “child-occupied facility” means a building, or portion of a building, which, as part of its function, receives children under 6 years of age on a regular basis and is required to obtain a certificate of occupancy as a precondition to performing that function. The term “child-occupied facility” includes a daycare center, nursery, preschool center, kindergarten classroom, child development center, child development home, child development facility, child-placing agency, infant care center, or similar entity. The location of a child-occupied facility as part of a larger structure does not make the entire structure a child-occupied facility. Only the portion of the facility occupied or regularly visited by children 6 years of age shall be considered the Child-occupied facility.

(d)

Beginning 12 months after April 20, 2013:

(1)

A dry cleaning establishment shall use perchloroethylene or n-propyl bromide as a cleaning agent for clothes or other fabrics only after obtaining a source category permit from the District Department of the Environment in accordance with Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (20 DCMR § 200 et seq.).

(2)

No permit shall be issued to a dry cleaning establishment to use perchloroethlyene or n-propyl bromide as a cleaning agent for clothes or other fabrics that is located within 200 feet of an existing child-occupied facility. The 200-foot restriction shall not apply at a location where a dry cleaning establishment has used perchloroethylene or n-propyl bromide within 90 days before April 20, 2013.

History

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-336, § 4, 58 DCR 605
Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-262, § 302, 60 DCR 1300

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-262 rewrote the section heading, which formerly read: “Phase out of perchloroethylene in dry cleaning”; substituted “perchloroethylene or n-propyl bromide” for “perchloroethylene” in (a) and (b); and added (c) and (d).